Washington statutes.
RCW 34.05.665

Submission of rule for review—State employees protected.

Any individual employed or holding office in any department or agency of state government may submit rules warranting review to the rules review committee. Any such state employee is protected under chapter 42.40 RCW.

[ 1995 c 403 s 503.]

NOTES:

Findings—Short title—Intent—1995 c 403: See note following RCW 34.05.328.